Utah statutes.
16-6a-116.   Private foundations.
Except as otherwise specified in the articles of incorporation or as provided
by a court of competent jurisdiction, a nonprofit corporation that is a
private foundation as defined in Section 509(a), Internal Revenue Code:
(1)  shall make distributions for each taxable year at the time and in the
manner as not to subject the nonprofit corporation to tax under Section 4942,
Internal Revenue Code;
(2)  may not engage in any act of self-dealing as defined in Section 4941(d),
Internal Revenue Code;
(3)  may not retain any excess business holdings as defined in Section
4943(c), Internal Revenue Code;
(4)  may not make any investments that would subject the nonprofit corporation
to taxation under Section 4944, Internal Revenue Code; and
(5)  may not make any taxable expenditures as defined in Section 4945(d),
Internal Revenue Code.
